North Dakota statutes. TITLE 11 Counties
CHAPTER 11-31 County Highway Engineer

11-31-01.
County highway engineer.

The board of county commissioners of any county in this state may at the discretion of the board employ a qualified county highway engineer at any time or the office of county highway engineer may be created in any county in this state by an election duly held.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 160, § 1; 1949, ch. 127, § 1; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-3101.

11-31-01.1.
Election for creation or termination of office of county highway engineer.

Upon the filing with the county auditor of a petition signed by not less than five percent of the qualified electors of the county as determined by the total number of votes cast in the last election, representing not less than seven percent of the voting precincts of the county, asking that an election be held on the question of the creation of the office of county highway engineer, the board of county commissioners shall submit the question at the next regular primary or general election. Notice of the election shall be given in the manner prescribed by law for the submission of questions to the qualified electors of a county under the general election law. If a majority of the votes cast on the question are in favor thereof, the office of county highway engineer shall be established and the board of county commissioners shall fill such office by appointment. The office so created shall not be terminated except upon the instruction of a majority of the qualified electors voting on the question in an election similarly held but any engineer appointed to fill such office may be removed from office by action of the board.

Source:

S.L. 1949, ch. 127, § 2; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-31011; S.L. 1985, ch. 235, § 26.

11-31-02.
Qualification and employment basis.

The person employed or appointed as county highway engineer must be a duly qualified highway engineer. The compensation and other terms of service of such engineer shall be determined by the board of county commissioners and may be on a monthly or a per diem basis. Several counties may employ or appoint the same engineer.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 160, § 2; 1949, ch. 127, § 3; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-3102.

11-31-03.
Powers and duties.

Under the direction and supervision of the board of county commissioners, the county engineer shall:

Design and make plans for county and township highways.

Set up a comprehensive plan of county highways, showing by the use of maps, existing roads, operations in progress, and future plans.

Superintend county construction and maintenance operations pertaining to highways and bridges.

Keep a complete record of costs and expenditures.

Check all accounts, claims, and demands for expenditures in connection with all matters supervised by the county engineer and indicate the county engineer’s recommendation prior to the submission of such accounts, claims, and demands to the board of county commissioners.

Keep a complete inventory of all equipment, repairs, gasoline and oil, and miscellaneous items.

Supervise the use and disposition of all county-owned road equipment and materials.

Employ and supervise all other personnel engaged in county road operations, terminating such employment when required in the best interest of the county.

Prepare and submit to the board of county commissioners a complete yearly report and such additional reports as may be required by the board of county commissioners at any time.

Cooperate with the federal highway administration or successors, the state department of transportation, and the townships of the county.

Perform such other duties as may be designated by the board of county commissioners.

When so directed by the board of county commissioners, the county engineers shall also, under the direction and supervision of the board of county commissioners or the drainage board, as the case may be, prepare plans and specifications and supervise the construction and repair of drainage ditches.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 160, § 3; 1949, ch. 127, § 4; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-3103; 2017, ch. 57, § 2, effective August 1, 2017.

11-31-04.
Manner of payment of compensation.

Payment for the work actually performed by the county engineer may be made out of the county road and bridge fund or the general funds of the county upon certified vouchers showing the time actually expended and the contract price agreed upon. Such vouchers shall be filed with the county auditor and approved by the board of county commissioners, in the manner now provided by law for the filing and approval of other claims against the counties.

Source:

S.L. 1945, ch. 160, § 4; 1949, ch. 127, § 5; R.C. 1943, 1957 Supp., § 11-3104.